Nevada, session 83, SB343.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 549.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
549.010 To provide for continued educational, research,
outreach and service programs pertaining to agriculture, community
development, health and nutrition, horticulture, personal and family
development, and natural resources in the rural and urban
communities in the State of Nevada, the Director of the
[Agricultural] University of Nevada Cooperative Extension
[Department] of the Public Service Division of the Nevada System
of Higher Education and the boards of county commissioners of any
or all of the respective counties of the State of Nevada may enter
into cooperative agreements and activities subject to the provisions
of this chapter.
Sec. 2. NRS 549.020 is hereby amended to read as follows:
549.020 1. The Director of the [Agricultural] University of
Nevada Cooperative Extension [Department] of the Public Service
Division of the Nevada System of Higher Education shall prepare
and submit to the board of county commissioners, for each county
participating, an annual financial budget covering the county, state
and federal funds cooperating in the cost of educational, research,
outreach and service programs pertaining to agriculture, community
development, health and nutrition, horticulture, personal and family
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 5 –
development, and natural resources in the rural and urban
communities in the State of Nevada.
2. The budget must be adopted by the board of county
commissioners and certified as a part of the annual county budget,
and the county tax levy provided for agricultural extension work in
the annual county budget must include a levy of not less than 1 cent
on each $100 of taxable property. If the proceeds of the county tax
levy of 1 cent are insufficient to meet the county’s share of the
cooperative agricultural extension work, as provided in the
combined annual financial budget, the board of county
commissioners may, by unanimous vote, levy an additional tax so
that the total in no instance exceeds 5 cents on each $100 of the
county tax rate.
3. The proceeds of such a tax must be placed in the agricultural
extension fund in each county treasury and must be paid out on
claims drawn by the agricultural extension agent of the county as
designated by the Director of the [Agricultural] University of
Nevada Cooperative Extension [Department] of the Public Service
Division of the Nevada System of Higher Education, when
approved by the Director and countersigned by the Treasurer of the
Nevada System of Higher Education.
4. A record of all such claims approved and paid, segregated by
counties, must be kept by the Treasurer of the Nevada System of
Higher Education. The cost of maintaining the record must be paid
from state funds provided for by this chapter.
5. The State’s cooperative share of the cost of such agricultural
extension work, as entered in the budget described in this section,
must not be more than a sum equal to the proceeds of 1 cent of such
county tax rate; but when the proceeds of a 1-cent tax rate are
insufficient to carry out the provisions of the budget previously
adopted, the Director of the [Agricultural] University of Nevada
Cooperative Extension [Department] of the Public Service Division
of the Nevada System of Higher Education is authorized to
supplement the State’s cooperative share from the funds as may be
made available in the Public Service Division Fund of the Nevada
System of Higher Education.
Sec. 3. NRS 549.030 is hereby amended to read as follows:
549.030 1. A certified copy of the county extension work
budget as adopted and approved pursuant to NRS 549.020 must be
filed with the Treasurer of the Nevada System of Higher Education
within 10 days after its approval by the board of county
commissioners.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
2. Necessary modifications thereof, involving county and state
funds, resulting from leaves of absence without pay, resignations,
changes in salary, dismissals or employment of any cooperative
agent, variations in expense accounts or otherwise, not involving an
increase in the total expenditures provided to be paid from the funds
and consistent with the purposes of this chapter, may be made by
filing with the Treasurer of the Nevada System of Higher Education
and the board of county commissioners a revised budget, approved
by the Director of the [Agricultural] University of Nevada
Cooperative Extension [Department] of the Public Service Division
of the Nevada System of Higher Education and countersigned by the
Treasurer of the Nevada System of Higher Education.
Sec. 4. NRS 549.050 is hereby amended to read as follows:
549.050 All moneys appropriated pursuant to NRS 549.040
must be expended under the direction of the Director of the
[Agricultural] University of Nevada Cooperative Extension
[Department] of the Public Service Division of the Nevada System
of Higher Education to the extent of the financial budget for
cooperation between the State and the respective counties provided
for in NRS 549.020.
Sec. 5. NRS 550.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
550.010 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires:
1. “Board of Regents” means the Board of Regents of the
University of Nevada.
2. “Director” means the Director of the [Agricultural]
University of Nevada Cooperative Extension [Department] of the
Public Service Division of the Nevada System of Higher Education.
3. “State 4-H Camp” means the State 4-H Camp Institute and
Exhibit.
Sec. 6. NRS 550.030 is hereby amended to read as follows:
550.030 The purpose of the State 4-H Camp is to provide a
living and learning environment [to] in a natural setting where
members of 4-H clubs and other youth groups [which is conducive
to stimulating the development of youth to a high standard of useful]
may learn life skills, leadership, citizenship and [productive
citizenship.] an appreciation for nature. The State 4-H Camp shall
render assistance and conduct such programs as will develop
leadership aptitudes, skills and other attributes necessary for the
intellectual and physical development of the youth to be served and
thus perpetuate the work embodied in the creed of the 4-H clubs of
the United States.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
Sec. 7. NRS 550.035 is hereby amended to read as follows:
550.035 1. The State 4-H Camp Advisory Council is hereby
created, to consist of 12 members chosen for terms of 3 years as
follows:
[1.] (a) Four members from the leaders of 4-H clubs in this
State, elected by the leaders.
[2.] (b) Two members appointed by the President of the
University of Nevada, Reno.
[3.] (c) Four members designated [from among its members] by
the Nevada Farm Bureau.
[4.] (d) Two members [from the Agricultural Extension
Service, elected by the county agents.] designated by the Director.
2. To the extent practicable, the terms of the members of the
Council must be staggered.
3. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a member
may not serve more than two consecutive terms but may serve
more than two terms if there is a break in service of not less than 1
year. A member may serve three consecutive terms with the
approval of the Director.
Sec. 8. NRS 550.050 is hereby amended to read as follows:
550.050 [1.] The Director, or his or designee, under the
supervision and control of the Board of Regents, is authorized and
directed:
[(a)] 1. To care for, manage and develop all property, lands,
buildings and equipment of the State 4-H Camp.
[(b)] 2. To make uniform regulations for the use and
occupancy thereof, not contrary to the provisions of this chapter,
giving priority of use first to Nevada 4-H club members and second
to other youth groups of the State.
[(c)] 3. To attend to the entire business and financial affairs of
the State 4-H Camp, including submission of a specific budget to
the Board of Regents for the development, operation and
management of the property.
[2. To that end, the Director shall cooperate with the State 4-H
Camp Advisory Council, the State 4-H Leaders’ Council, youth
organizations, farm organizations, counties and cities in this State,
and other private or government organizations or individuals
deemed advisable in order to carry out the purposes of this chapter.]
Sec. 9. NRS 550.070 is hereby amended to read as follows:
550.070 1. Any parcel or parcels of real property composing
the State 4-H Camp may not be leased, exchanged or sold except
pursuant to the express authority of the Legislature.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
2. The Board of Regents, upon the recommendation of the
Director or his or her designee, and the State 4-H Camp Advisory
Council, and with the approval of the Governor, may [lease,
exchange or sell any] submit a recommendation to the Legislative
Commission that a parcel or parcels of real property composing the
State 4-H Camp be leased, exchanged or sold when such land can
no longer serve the purpose and intent of this chapter. When any
such land is so leased or sold, the proceeds shall be credited to the
Account of the State 4-H Camp and used, consistently with the
purpose and intent of this chapter, only for:
[1.] (a) Further development and operations of the present State
4-H Camp;
[2.] (b) Re-establishment and development of the State 4-H
Camp on a new site; or
[3.] (c) Establishment and development of branches.
Sec. 10. NRS 550.080 is hereby amended to read as follows:
550.080 1. With the approval of the Board of Regents and the
4-H Camp Advisory Council, the Director or his or her designee, is
authorized to conduct negotiations with public or private agencies
for:
(a) The acquisition or granting of rights-of-way.
(b) The adjustment of boundaries.
(c) Adequate highways and means of ingress and egress to and
from the site of the State 4-H Camp.
(d) Adequate fire and other protection.
(e) Necessary water, sewer and utility services.
2. No such negotiations shall bind the Board of Regents or the
State or require the conveyance by [it] the Board of Regents or the
State of any lands or rights in or to lands, unless or until the same
shall be ratified and specifically authorized by the Board of Regents
[.] and the Legislature.
Sec. 11. NRS 553.040 is hereby amended to read as follows:
553.040 1. Every agricultural demonstration farm or plot
under the provisions of this chapter must be conducted by the
owner, lessee or manager thereof under the supervision of the
[Agricultural] University of Nevada Cooperative Extension
[Department] of the Public Service Division of the Nevada System
of Higher Education and in accordance with the terms of a written
project agreement entered into with the [Agricultural] University of
Nevada Cooperative Extension [Department] of the Public Service
Division of the Nevada System of Higher Education and approved
by the board of county commissioners of the county in which the
agricultural farm or plot is located.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
2. The agreement must include the keeping by the owner,
lessee or manager of accurate and systematic records and accounts
in the form prescribed by the [Agricultural] University of Nevada
Cooperative Extension [Department] of the Public Service Division
of the Nevada System of Higher Education. The records and
accounts must be subject to inspection, use and publication in
furtherance of the purposes of this chapter.
Sec. 12. NRS 553.050 is hereby amended to read as follows:
553.050 1. The purpose of demonstration farms is to
demonstrate the results of improved systems of farm management
and accountancy as prescribed by the [Agricultural] University of
Nevada Cooperative Extension [Department] of the Public Service
Division of the Nevada System of Higher Education and applied to
the farm units.
2. The purpose of demonstration plots is to demonstrate the
value and importance of new or improved varieties of crops, soil
management and soil and climate adaptability to certain crops.
Sec. 13. NRS 553.070 is hereby amended to read as follows:
553.070 1. Any county desiring to avail itself of the
provisions of this chapter shall, by resolution of its board of county
commissioners, bind itself to pay to the owner, lessee or manager of
the demonstration farm or plot as follows:
(a) For each demonstration farm, the sum of $10 per acre, but
not exceeding the sum of $100 for any such demonstration farm
unit.
(b) For any demonstration plot, a minimum of $25 if it is less
than 3 acres, and $10 per acre if it contains 3 acres or more.
2. The sums must be paid annually for each year the
demonstration is to be continued on the certification by the
[Agricultural] University of Nevada Cooperative Extension
[Department] of the Public Service Division of the Nevada System
of Higher Education that the demonstration has been conducted in
accordance with the agreement.
3. A county is not obligated under the provisions of this
section, except with respect to demonstration farms and plots which
have been approved by the board of county commissioners as
provided in NRS 553.040.
4. The authority to provide for such expenditure in the county
budget and to disburse the money is hereby granted to the board of
county commissioners and the other officers of the several counties.
Sec. 14. NRS 553.090 is hereby amended to read as follows:
553.090 The [Agricultural] University of Nevada Cooperative
Extension [Department] of the Public Service Division of the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
Nevada System of Higher Education annually shall prepare the
information resulting from the demonstration in a form serviceable
to aid and advance agricultural welfare of the State. The
[Agricultural] University of Nevada Cooperative Extension
[Department] shall cause to be printed a number of copies thereof as
may be deemed necessary, not exceeding 10,000, and shall
distribute the copies without charge.
Sec. 15. NRS 179.1217 is hereby amended to read as follows:
179.1217 “Technological crime” [has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS 205A.030.] means the commission of, attempt to commit
or conspiracy to commit any crime that involves, directly or
indirectly, any component, device, equipment, system or network
that, alone or in conjunction with any other component, device,
equipment, system or network, is designed or has the capability to:
1. Be programmed; or
2. Generate, process, store, retrieve, convey, emit, transmit,
receive, relay, record or reproduce any data, information, image,
program, signal or sound in a technological format, including,
without limitation, a format that involves analog, digital,
electronic, electromagnetic, magnetic or optical technology.
Sec. 16. NRS 179.1233 is hereby amended to read as follows:
179.1233 1. The State, county or city shall sell any property
forfeited pursuant to NRS 179.1219 or 179.1229 as soon as
commercially feasible. Except as otherwise provided in subsection
2, the proceeds from such a sale must be used first for payment of
all proper expenses of any proceedings for the forfeiture and sale,
including, without limitation, any expenses for the seizure and
maintenance of the property, advertising and court costs. The
balance of the proceeds, if any, must be deposited in the [Account
for the Technological Crime Advisory Board created pursuant to
NRS 205A.090.] State Treasury and accounted for separately in
the State General Fund.
2. If the property forfeited is encumbered by a bona fide
security interest and the secured party shows that the secured party
did not consent or have knowledge of the violation causing the
forfeiture, the State, county or city shall pay the existing balance or
return the property to the secured party.
3. The proceeds deposited in the account pursuant to
subsection 1:
(a) Must be distributed by the Attorney General to the federal,
state and local law enforcement agencies that participated in the
investigation of the unlawful act giving rise to the criminal or civil
forfeiture in accordance with the level of participation of each law
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
enforcement agency as determined by the Attorney General. If the
participating law enforcement agencies have entered into an
agreement to share any such money, the Attorney General shall
distribute the money to the law enforcement agencies in
accordance with the provisions of the agreement.
(b) Do not revert to the State General Fund at the end of each
fiscal year.
4. Any claims against the account must be paid as other
claims against the State are paid.
Sec. 17. NRS 228.178 is hereby amended to read as follows:
228.178 1. The Attorney General may:
(a) Investigate and prosecute any alleged technological crime.
(b) Pursue the forfeiture of property relating to a technological
crime in accordance with the provisions of NRS 179.1211 to
179.1235, inclusive.
(c) Bring an action to enjoin or obtain any other equitable relief
to prevent the occurrence or continuation of a technological crime.
2. As used in this section, “technological crime” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS [205A.030.] 179.1217.
Sec. 18. NRS 233B.039 is hereby amended to read as follows:
233B.039 1. The following agencies are entirely exempted
from the requirements of this chapter:
(a) The Governor.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 7 and NRS
209.221 and 209.2473, the Department of Corrections.
(c) The Nevada System of Higher Education.
(d) The Office of the Military.
(e) The Nevada Gaming Control Board.
(f) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 368A.140 and 463.765,
the Nevada Gaming Commission.
(g) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 425.620, the Division
of Welfare and Supportive Services of the Department of Health and
Human Services.
(h) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 422.390, the Division
of Health Care Financing and Policy of the Department of Health
and Human Services.
(i) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 533.365, the Office of
the State Engineer.
(j) The Division of Industrial Relations of the Department of
Business and Industry acting to enforce the provisions of
NRS 618.375.
(k) The Administrator of the Division of Industrial Relations of
the Department of Business and Industry in establishing and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 12 –
adjusting the schedule of fees and charges for accident benefits
pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 616C.260.
(l) The Board to Review Claims in adopting resolutions to carry
out its duties pursuant to NRS 445C.310.
(m) The Silver State Health Insurance Exchange.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5 and NRS
391.323, the Department of Education, the Board of the Public
Employees’ Benefits Program and the Commission on Professional
Standards in Education are subject to the provisions of this chapter
for the purpose of adopting regulations but not with respect to any
contested case.
3. The special provisions of:
(a) Chapter 612 of NRS for the adoption of an emergency
regulation or the distribution of regulations by and the judicial
review of decisions of the Employment Security Division of the
Department of Employment, Training and Rehabilitation;
(b) Chapters 616A to 617, inclusive, of NRS for the
determination of contested claims;
(c) Chapter 91 of NRS for the judicial review of decisions of the
Administrator of the Securities Division of the Office of the
Secretary of State; and
(d) NRS 90.800 for the use of summary orders in contested
cases,
 prevail over the general provisions of this chapter.
4. The provisions of NRS 233B.122, 233B.124, 233B.125 and
233B.126 do not apply to the Department of Health and Human
Services in the adjudication of contested cases involving the
issuance of letters of approval for health facilities and agencies.
5. The provisions of this chapter do not apply to:
(a) Any order for immediate action, including, but not limited
to, quarantine and the treatment or cleansing of infected or infested
animals, objects or premises, made under the authority of the State
Board of Agriculture, the State Board of Health, or any other agency
of this State in the discharge of a responsibility for the preservation
of human or animal health or for insect or pest control;
(b) An extraordinary regulation of the State Board of Pharmacy
adopted pursuant to NRS 453.2184;
(c) A regulation adopted by the State Board of Education
pursuant to NRS 388.255 or 394.1694;
(d) The judicial review of decisions of the Public Utilities
Commission of Nevada;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 13 –
(e) The adoption, amendment or repeal of policies by the
Rehabilitation Division of the Department of Employment, Training
and Rehabilitation pursuant to NRS 426.561 or 615.178;
(f) The adoption or amendment of a rule or regulation to be
included in the State Plan for Services for Victims of Crime by the
Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to
NRS 217.130;
(g) The adoption, amendment or repeal of rules governing the
conduct of contests and exhibitions of unarmed combat by the
Nevada Athletic Commission pursuant to NRS 467.075;
(h) [The adoption, amendment or repeal of standards of content
and performance for courses of study in public schools by the
Council to Establish Academic Standards for Public Schools and the
State Board of Education pursuant to NRS 389.520;
(i)] The adoption, amendment or repeal of the statewide plan to
allocate money from the Fund for a Resilient Nevada created by
NRS 433.732 established by the Department of Health and Human
Services pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of NRS 433.734;
or
[(j)] (i) The adoption or amendment of a data request by the
Commissioner of Insurance pursuant to NRS 687B.404.
6. The State Board of Parole Commissioners is subject to the
provisions of this chapter for the purpose of adopting regulations but
not with respect to any contested case.
7. The Department of Corrections is subject to the provisions
of this chapter for the purpose of adopting regulations relating to
fiscal policy, correspondence with inmates and visitation with
inmates of the Department of Corrections.
Sec. 19. NRS 242.183 is hereby amended to read as follows:
242.183 1. The Chief of the Office of Information Security
shall investigate and resolve any breach of an information system of
a state agency or elected officer that uses the equipment or services
of the Office of the Chief Information Officer or an application of
such an information system or unauthorized acquisition of
computerized data that materially compromises the security,
confidentiality or integrity of such an information system.
2. The Chief Information Officer or Chief of the Office of
Information Security, at his or her discretion, may inform members
of the [Technological Crime Advisory Board created by NRS
205A.040, the] Nevada Commission on Homeland Security created
by NRS 239C.120 and the Information Technology Advisory Board
created by NRS 242.122 of any breach of an information system of
a state agency or elected officer or application of such an
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 14 –
information system or unauthorized acquisition of computerized
data or information that materially compromises the security,
confidentiality or integrity of such an information system.
Sec. 20. NRS 284.140 is hereby amended to read as follows:
284.140 The unclassified service of the State consists of the
following state officers or employees in the Executive Department
of the State Government who receive annual salaries for their
services:
1. Members of boards and commissions, and heads of
departments, agencies and institutions required by law to be
appointed.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 223.085, 223.600 and
232.461 all persons required by law to be appointed by the
Governor or heads of departments or agencies appointed by the
Governor or by boards.
3. All employees other than clerical in the Office of the
Attorney General and the State Public Defender required by law to
be appointed by the Attorney General or the State Public Defender.
4. Except as otherwise provided by the Board of Regents of the
University of Nevada pursuant to NRS 396.251, officers and
members of the teaching staff and the staffs of the [Agricultural]
University of Nevada Cooperative Extension [Department] and
Experiment Station of the Nevada System of Higher Education, or
any other state institution of learning, and student employees of
these institutions. Custodial, clerical or maintenance employees of
these institutions are in the classified service. The Board of Regents
of the University of Nevada shall assist the Administrator in
carrying out the provisions of this chapter applicable to the Nevada
System of Higher Education.
5. All other officers and employees authorized by law to be
employed in the unclassified service.
Sec. 21. NRS 284.343 is hereby amended to read as follows:
284.343 1. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
after consultation with appointing authorities, and in cooperation
with the State Board of Examiners, the Commission shall adopt
regulations for all training of employees in the state service.
Professional employees of the teaching staff, [Agricultural]
University of Nevada Cooperative Extension [Service] and Nevada
Agricultural Experiment Station staffs of the Nevada System of
Higher Education, or any other state institution of learning and
student employees of such an institution are exempt from the
provisions of this section.
2. The regulations adopted pursuant to subsection 1 must:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 15 –
(a) Include requirements for the training of supervisors and
managerial employees concerning implicit bias.
(b) Set forth the conditions under which educational leave
stipends may be paid to any officer or employee of the State. Except
as otherwise provided in NRS 612.230 and with the exception of
intermittent course work not leading to the awarding of a degree, no
person may be granted educational leave stipends until the person
has entered into a contract with the person’s employing agency
whereby the person agrees to pursue only those courses required for
a degree related to the person’s employment with the State and to
return to the employ of the person’s employing agency on the basis
of 1 year for each 9 months of educational leave taken or to refund
the total amount of the stipends regardless of the balance at the time
of separation.
3. This section does not prevent the granting of sabbatical
leaves by the Board of Regents of the University of Nevada.
4. Where practicable all training for state employees must be
presented through established educational institutions within the
State.
5. The Division shall coordinate all training activities related to
remedial programs and programs for career development designed
to correct educational and training deficiencies of state employees
and create employment opportunities for the disadvantaged. In
connection with these activities, the Division, with the approval of
the Governor, is designated to enter into contractual arrangements
with the Federal Government and others that provide grants or other
money for educational and training activities.
Sec. 22. NRS 385.114 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385.114 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 2 and
3, the State Board shall prescribe and cause to be enforced the
courses of study for the public schools of this State. [The courses of
study prescribed and enforced by the State Board must comply with
the standards of content and performance established by the Council
to Establish Academic Standards for Public Schools pursuant to
NRS 389.520.]
2. For those courses of study prescribed by the State Board:
(a) High schools may have modified courses of study, subject to
the approval of the State Board; and
(b) Any high school offering courses normally accredited as
being beyond the level of the 12th grade shall, before offering such
courses, have them approved by the State Board.
3. A charter school is not required to offer the courses of study
prescribed by the State Board except for those courses of study
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 16 –
which are required for promotion to the next grade or graduation
from high school.
Sec. 23. NRS 385.635 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385.635 1. The Office of Parental Involvement and Family
Engagement created by NRS 385.630 shall:
(a) Review and evaluate the programs implemented by the
school districts and public schools, including, without limitation,
programs which are supported in part with money received from the
Federal Government, for carrying out and increasing parental
involvement and family engagement in the public schools. The
review and evaluation must include an identification of current
strategies and practices for effective parental involvement and
family engagement.
(b) Develop a list of practices which have been proven effective
in increasing the involvement of parents and the engagement of
families in the education of their children, including, without
limitation, practices that increase the ability of school districts and
public schools to effectively reengage parents and families and
provide those parents and families with the skills and resources
necessary to support the academic achievement of their children.
(c) Work in cooperation with the Statewide Council for the
Coordination of the Regional Training Programs in carrying out the
duties of the Office, including, without limitation, the establishment
of a statewide training program concerning parental involvement
and family engagement required pursuant to NRS 391A.135.
(d) Provide information to the school districts and public
schools on the availability of competitive grants for programs which
offer:
(1) Professional development for educational personnel on
practices to reengage disengaged parents and families in the
education of their children;
(2) Training for parents and families in skills of leadership
and volunteerism;
(3) Family literacy training;
(4) Home visitation programs to encourage the involvement
of parents and the engagement of families in the education of their
children; and
(5) Other innovative programs that are designed to increase
the involvement of parents and the engagement of families in the
academic achievement of their children.
(e) Provide support to those school districts which have
established an advisory council on parental involvement and family
engagement pursuant to NRS 385.625 and encourage those school
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 17 –
districts which have not established such an advisory council to
consider creating an advisory council for the school district.
(f) Build the capacity of public schools to work in collaboration
with parents to establish policies for the involvement of parents and
the engagement of families, including, without limitation, policies
that focus on partnerships between public schools and the parents
and families of children enrolled in public schools and the
empowerment of parents and families in support of the education of
their children.
(g) Work in cooperation with the Commission on Professional
Standards in Education in developing the regulations required by
paragraph (g) of subsection 1 of NRS 391.019 and monitoring the
implementation of those regulations.
(h) [Establish, in collaboration with the State Board, guidelines
to assist parents and families in helping their children achieve the
standards of content and performance adopted by the State Board
pursuant to NRS 389.520.
(i)] Collaborate with the Nevada State Parent Information and
Resource Center, the Parent Training and Information Centers, the
Nevada Parent Teacher Association, the Advisory Council and the
teachers who are trained to serve as liaisons to parents and legal
guardians of pupils enrolled in public schools to plan and implement
a statewide summit on parental involvement and family
engagement, which must be held at least biennially. After each
summit, the Office of Parental Involvement and Family Engagement
shall evaluate the success of the summit in consultation with the
entities identified in this paragraph.
[(j)] (i) Assist each school district and the public schools within
the school district with incorporating strategies and practices for
effective parental involvement and family engagement into the plans
to improve the achievement of pupils prepared by the public schools
pursuant to NRS 385A.650.
[(k)] (j) Work in partnership with the Advisory Council to:
(1) Review and evaluate the annual reports of accountability
prepared by the board of trustees of each school district pursuant to
NRS 385A.070 relating to parental involvement and family
engagement in the school districts and public schools;
(2) Review and evaluate the plans to improve the
achievement of pupils prepared by each public school pursuant to
NRS 385A.650 relating to the strategies and practices for effective
parental involvement and family engagement incorporated into the
plans; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 18 –
(3) Review the status of the implementation of the provisions
of this section and the effectiveness of the Office in carrying out the
duties prescribed in this section.
2. On or before August 1 of each year, the Office of Parental
Involvement and Family Engagement shall prepare a report which
includes a summary of the:
(a) Status of the progress made by the school districts and public
schools in effectively involving parents and engaging families in the
education of their children and an identification of any areas where
further improvement is needed; and
(b) Activities of the Office during the immediately preceding
school year, including the progress made by the Office, in
consultation with the Advisory Council, in assisting the school
districts and public schools with increasing the effectiveness of
involving parents and engaging families in the education of their
children.
3. The Department shall post on its Internet website:
(a) The list of practices developed by the Office of Parental
Involvement and Family Engagement pursuant to paragraph (b) of
subsection 1;
(b) The report prepared by the Office pursuant to subsection 2;
and
(c) Any other information that the Office finds useful for the
school districts, public schools, parents, families and general public
relating to effective parental involvement and family engagement.
Sec. 24. NRS 385A.290 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385A.290 The annual report of accountability prepared
pursuant to NRS 385A.070 must include, for each school in the
district and the district as a whole, including, without limitation,
each charter school sponsored by the district, information on pupils
enrolled in career and technical education, including, without
limitation:
1. The number of pupils enrolled in a course of career and
technical education;
2. The number of pupils who completed a course of career and
technical education;
3. The average daily attendance of pupils who are enrolled in a
program of career and technical education;
4. The annual rate of pupils who dropped out of school and
were enrolled in a program of career and technical education before
dropping out;
5. The number and percentage of pupils who completed a
program of career and technical education and who received a
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 19 –
standard high school diploma, an adjusted diploma or an alternative
diploma; and
6. The number and percentage of pupils who completed a
program of career and technical education and who did not receive a
high school diploma because the pupils failed to satisfy the
requirements of subsection 3 [or 4] of NRS 390.600 or the criteria
prescribed by the State Board pursuant to subsection 1 of
NRS 390.600.
Sec. 25. NRS 385A.500 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385A.500 The annual report of accountability prepared by the
State Board pursuant to NRS 385A.400 must include for each
school district, including, without limitation, each charter school in
the district and for this State as a whole, information on pupils
enrolled in career and technical education, including, without
limitation:
1. The number of pupils enrolled in a course of career and
technical education;
2. The number of pupils who completed a course of career and
technical education;
3. The average daily attendance of pupils who are enrolled in a
program of career and technical education;
4. The annual rate of pupils who dropped out of school and
were enrolled in a program of career and technical education before
dropping out;
5. The number and percentage of pupils who completed a
program of career and technical education and who received a
standard high school diploma, an adjusted diploma or an alternative
diploma; and
6. The number and percentage of pupils who completed a
program of career and technical education and who did not receive a
high school diploma because the pupils failed to satisfy the
requirements of subsection 3 [or 4] of NRS 390.600 or the criteria
prescribed by the State Board pursuant to subsection 1 of
NRS 390.600.
Sec. 26. NRS 387.652 is hereby amended to read as follows:
387.652 1. The Department shall, to the extent money is
available, award grants of money to school districts, sponsors of
charter schools and nonprofit organizations to support
prekindergarten programs. Each prekindergarten program supported
by a grant awarded pursuant to this section must:
(a) Employ at least one teacher per classroom who has a
bachelor’s degree or higher in early childhood education and
compensate those teachers with pay and benefits similar to those
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 20 –
provided to licensed teachers by the school district in which the
prekindergarten program is located;
(b) Serve children who are 4 years of age at the beginning of the
school year and whose household has a household income which is
not more than 200 percent of the federally designated level
signifying poverty;
(c) Provide instruction in prekindergarten for at least 25 hours
each week for the entire school year;
(d) [Utilize a comprehensive curriculum for prekindergarten that
is aligned to any standards of content and performance established
for prekindergarten pursuant to NRS 389.520;
(e)] Maintain the size of each class at not more than 20 pupils
and a ratio of not more than 10 pupils for each adult with
supervision in the classroom;
[(f)] (e) Participate in any evaluation of the program or the
pupils who participate in the program that is prescribed by the
regulations adopted pursuant to NRS 387.656;
[(g)] (f) Effectively engage the parents or guardians of pupils
and participate in any evaluation of such engagement that is
required by the regulations adopted pursuant to NRS 387.656;
[(h)] (g) Serve pupils with disabilities at a rate that is not less
than the percentage of pupils in this State or in the United States,
whichever is greater, who are 4 years of age at the beginning of the
school year who receive services funded pursuant to 20 U.S.C. §
1419;
[(i)] (h) Ensure that the percentage of pupils with disabilities in
each class is less than 49 percent of the total number of pupils;
[(j)] (i) Provide appropriate individualized accommodations and
supports for pupils with disabilities;
[(k)] (j) Provide the comprehensive services prescribed
pursuant to NRS 387.656; and
[(l)] (k) Meet the minimum standards of performance
prescribed pursuant to NRS 387.656.
2. The board of trustees of a school district, the sponsor of a
charter school or a nonprofit organization that wishes to receive a
grant of money pursuant to this section must submit an application
to the Department. The application must include, without limitation:
(a) A detailed description of the manner in which the board of
trustees, sponsor of a charter school or nonprofit organization
proposes to:
(1) Ensure that the prekindergarten program supported by the
grant meets the requirements of subsection 1; and
(2) Use the grant of money; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 21 –
(b) Any other information required by the Department.
Sec. 27. NRS 388.134 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.134 Each governing body shall:
1. Adopt the policy prescribed pursuant to NRS 388.133 . [and
the policy prescribed pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS 389.520.] The
governing body may adopt an expanded policy for [one or both of]
the [policies] policy if [each] the expanded policy complies with the
policy prescribed pursuant to NRS 388.133 . [or pursuant to
subsection 2 of NRS 389.520, as applicable.]
2. Provide for the appropriate training of members of the
governing body and all administrators, teachers and all other
personnel employed by the governing body in accordance with the
[policies] policy prescribed pursuant to NRS 388.133 . [and pursuant
to subsection 2 of NRS 389.520.] For members of the governing
body who have not previously served on the governing body or for
employees of the school district or school who have not previously
been employed by the district or school, the training required by this
subsection must be provided within 180 days after the member
begins his or her service or after the employee begins his or her
employment, as applicable.
3. Post the [policies] policy adopted pursuant to subsection 1
on the Internet website maintained by the school district or school.
4. Ensure that the parents and legal guardians of pupils
enrolled in the school district or school have sufficient information
concerning the availability of the [policies,] policy, including,
without limitation, information that describes how to access the
[policies] policy on the Internet website maintained by the school
district or school. Upon the request of a parent or legal guardian, the
school district or school shall provide the parent or legal guardian
with a written copy of the [policies.] policy.
5. Review the [policies] policy adopted pursuant to subsection
1 on an annual basis and update the [policies] policy if necessary. If
the governing body updates the [policies,] policy, the governing
body must submit a copy of the updated [policies] policy to the
Department within 30 days after the update.
Sec. 28. NRS 388.518 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.518 The Advisory Committee on Language Development
for Children Who Are Deaf, Hard of Hearing, Blind or Visually
Impaired shall:
1. Recommend to the State Board criteria for use by parents or
guardians to evaluate the development of language and literacy
skills by children who are less than 6 years of age and are deaf, hard
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 22 –
of hearing, blind or visually impaired, including, without limitation,
children who are both deaf and blind. The criteria must be:
(a) Appropriate for use to evaluate the development of language
and literacy skills by children who:
(1) Communicate using primarily spoken or written English,
with or without the use of visual supplements, or American Sign
Language; or
(2) Read using braille;
(b) Described in terms used to describe the typical development
of children, including, without limitation, children who do not have
a disability, and according to the age of the child; and
(c) [Aligned with the standards adopted pursuant to NRS
389.520 for English language arts and any standards adopted
pursuant to that section for early childhood education; and
(d)] Aligned with the Individuals with Disabilities Education
Act, 20 U.S.C. §§ 1400 et seq., and any other federal law applicable
to the assessment of the development of children with disabilities.
2. Make recommendations to the State Board and, where
appropriate, the Aging and Disability Services Division of the
Department of Health and Human Services concerning:
(a) The development of criteria pursuant to NRS 388.519;
(b) The examination of children with disabilities pursuant to
NRS 388.433; and
(c) Ways to improve the assessment of language and literacy
skills by children who are deaf, hard of hearing, blind or visually
impaired, including, without limitation, children who are both deaf
and blind.
Sec. 29. NRS 388A.405 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388A.405 1. To the extent money is available from
legislative appropriation or otherwise, a charter school may apply to
the Department for money for facilities if:
(a) The charter school has been operating in this State for at
least 5 consecutive years and is in good financial standing;
(b) Each financial audit and each performance audit of the
charter school required by the Department pursuant to NRS
388A.105 or 388A.110 contains no major notations, corrections or
errors concerning the charter school for at least 5 consecutive years;
(c) The charter school has met or exceeded the school
achievement targets and performance targets established pursuant to
the statewide system of accountability for public schools or has
demonstrated improvement in the achievement of pupils enrolled in
the charter school, as indicated by those school achievement targets
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 23 –
and performance targets, for the majority of the years of its
operation; and
(d) At least 75 percent of the pupils enrolled in grade 12 in the
charter school in the immediately preceding school year have
satisfied the requirements of subsection 3 [or 4] of NRS 390.600 or
the criteria prescribed by the State Board pursuant to subsection 1 of
NRS 390.600, if the charter school enrolls pupils at a high school
grade level.
2. A charter school that satisfies the requirements of subsection
1 shall submit to a performance audit as required by the Department
one time every 3 years. The sponsor of the charter school and the
Department shall not request a performance audit of the charter
school more frequently than every 3 years without reasonable
evidence of noncompliance in achieving the educational goals and
objectives of the charter school based upon the annual report
submitted to the Department pursuant to NRS 388A.351. If the
charter school no longer satisfies the requirements of subsection 1 or
if reasonable evidence of noncompliance in achieving the
educational goals and objectives of the charter school exists based
upon the annual report, the charter school shall, upon written notice
from the sponsor, submit to an annual performance audit.
Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (b) of subsection 1,
such a charter school:
(a) May, after undergoing the annual performance audit, reapply
to the sponsor to determine whether the charter school satisfies the
requirements of paragraphs (a), (c) and (d) of subsection 1.
(b) Is not eligible for any available money pursuant to
subsection 1 until the sponsor determines that the charter school
satisfies the requirements of that subsection.
3. A charter school that does not satisfy the requirements of
subsection 1 shall submit a quarterly report of the financial status of
the charter school if requested by the sponsor of the charter school.
Sec. 30. NRS 388C.120 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388C.120 1. A university school for profoundly gifted pupils
shall determine the eligibility of a pupil for admission to the school
based upon a comprehensive assessment of the pupil’s potential for
academic and intellectual achievement at the school, including,
without limitation, intellectual and academic ability, motivation,
emotional maturity and readiness for the environment of an
accelerated educational program. The assessment must be conducted
by a broad-based committee of professionals in the field of
education.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 24 –
2. A person who wishes to apply for admission to a university
school for profoundly gifted pupils must:
(a) Submit to the governing body of the school:
(1) A completed application;
(2) Evidence that the applicant possesses advanced
intellectual and academic ability, including, without limitation,
proof that he or she satisfies the requirements of NRS 388C.030;
(3) At least three letters of recommendation from teachers or
mentors familiar with the academic and intellectual ability of the
applicant;
(4) A transcript from each school previously attended by the
applicant; and
(5) Such other information as may be requested by the
university school or governing body of the school.
(b) If requested by the governing body of the school, participate
in an on-campus interview.
3. The curriculum developed for pupils in a university school
for profoundly gifted pupils must provide exposure to the subject
areas required of pupils enrolled in other public schools.
4. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall, upon
recommendation of the governing body, issue a high school diploma
to a pupil who is enrolled in a university school for profoundly
gifted pupils if that pupil:
(a) Satisfies the requirements of subsection 3 [or 4] of NRS
390.600; or
(b) Satisfies the criteria prescribed by the State Board pursuant
to subsection 1 of NRS 390.600, successfully passes the courses in
American government and American history as required by NRS
389.054 and 389.057 and successfully completes any requirements
established by the State Board of Education for graduation from
high school.
5. On or before March 1 of each odd-numbered year, the
governing body of a university school for profoundly gifted pupils
shall prepare and submit to the Superintendent of Public Instruction,
the president of the university where the university school for
profoundly gifted pupils is located, the State Board and the Director
of the Legislative Counsel Bureau a report that contains information
regarding the school, including, without limitation, the process used
by the school to identify and recruit profoundly gifted pupils from
diverse backgrounds and with diverse talents, and data assessing the
success of the school in meeting the educational needs of its pupils.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 25 –
Sec. 31. NRS 388G.210 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388G.210 1. Except as otherwise provided pursuant to a
waiver granted in accordance with NRS 388G.130 or 388G.140,
each empowerment school, each person employed by an
empowerment school and each pupil enrolled in an empowerment
school shall comply with the applicable requirements of state law,
including, without limitation, [the standards of content and
performance prescribed pursuant to NRS 389.520 and] the
examinations that are administered pursuant to NRS 390.105 and
the college and career readiness assessment administered pursuant
to NRS 390.610.
2. Each empowerment school may accept gifts, grants and
donations from any source for the support of its empowerment plan.
A person who gives a gift, grant or donation may designate all or
part of the gift, grant or donation specifically to carry out the
incentive pay structure of the school, if applicable.
Sec. 32. NRS 389.003 is hereby amended to read as follows:
389.003 Except as otherwise provided in NRS 389.041, boards
of trustees of school districts in this State shall enforce in schools [:
1. The standards of content and performance established by the
Council to Establish Academic Standards for Public Schools
pursuant to NRS 389.520 and the courses of study related to those
standards; and
2. The] the courses of study prescribed and adopted by the
State Board.
Sec. 33. NRS 389.061 is hereby amended to read as follows:
389.061 1. The board of trustees of each school district and
the governing body of each charter school shall ensure that
instruction is provided to pupils enrolled in kindergarten through
grade 12 in each public school within the school district or in the
charter school, as applicable, on the history and contributions to
science, the arts and humanities of:
(a) Native Americans and Native American tribes;
(b) Persons of marginalized sexual orientation or gender
identity;
(c) Persons with disabilities;
(d) Persons from various racial and ethnic backgrounds,
including, without limitation, persons who are African-American,
Basque, Hispanic or Asian or Pacific Islander;
(e) Persons from various socioeconomic statuses;
(f) Immigrants or refugees;
(g) Persons from various religious backgrounds; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 26 –
(h) Any other group of persons the board of trustees of a school
district or the governing body of a charter school deems appropriate.
2. [The standards of content and performance for the
instruction required by subsection 1 must be included in the
standards of content and performance established by the Council to
Establish Academic Standards for Public Schools pursuant to NRS
389.520.] The instruction required by subsection 1 must be:
(a) Age-appropriate; and
(b) Included within one or more courses of study for which the
Council has established the relevant standards of content and
performance.
Sec. 34. NRS 389.074 is hereby amended to read as follows:
389.074 1. The board of trustees of each school district and
the governing body of each charter school shall ensure that
instruction in financial literacy is provided to pupils enrolled in
grades 3 to 12, inclusive, in each public school within the school
district or in the charter school, as applicable. The instruction must
include, without limitation:
(a) The skills necessary to develop financial responsibility,
including, without limitation:
(1) Making reasonable financial decisions by analyzing the
alternatives and consequences of those financial decisions;
(2) Locating and evaluating financial information from
various sources;
(3) Judging the quality of services offered by a financial
institution;
(4) Developing communication strategies to discuss financial
issues;
(5) Controlling personal information; and
(6) Reviewing and summarizing federal and state consumer
protection laws.
(b) The skills necessary to manage finances, including, without
limitation:
(1) Developing a plan for spending and saving;
(2) Developing a system for keeping and using financial
records; and
(3) Developing a personal financial plan.
(c) The skills necessary to understand the use of credit and the
incurrence of debt, including, without limitation:
(1) Identifying the costs and benefits of various types of
credit;
(2) Understanding the methods to manage debt and the
consequences of acquiring debt;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 27 –
(3) Understanding how interest rates, compounding
frequency and the terms of a loan can affect the cost of credit;
(4) Completing an application for a loan;
(5) Understanding different types of loans, including, without
limitation, payday loans, automobile loans, student loans and
mortgages;
(6) Explaining the purpose of a credit report, including,
without limitation, the manner in which a credit report is used by
lenders;
(7) Describing the rights of a borrower regarding his or her
credit report;
(8) Identifying methods to avoid and resolve debt problems;
and
(9) Reviewing and summarizing federal and state consumer
credit protection laws.
(d) The skills necessary to understand the basic principles of
saving and investing, including, without limitation:
(1) Understanding how saving and investing contribute to
financial well-being;
(2) Understanding the methods of investing and alternatives
to investing;
(3) Understanding how to buy and sell investments;
(4) Understanding compound interest, including, without
limitation, in the context of investments;
(5) Understanding various types of securities, including,
without limitation, stocks and bonds; and
(6) Understanding how the regulation of financial institutions
protects investors.
(e) The skills necessary to prevent and limit the consequences of
identity theft and fraud.
(f) The skills necessary to understand the basic assessment of
taxes, including, without limitation, understanding the matter in
which taxes are computed by local, state and federal governmental
entities.
(g) The skills necessary to understand the basic principles of
insurance, including, without limitation:
(1) Understanding the function of various insurance policies;
and
(2) Determining the quality of an insurance provider.
(h) The skills necessary to plan for higher education and career
choices, including, without limitation:
(1) Information concerning institutions of higher education
and college preparedness;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 28 –
(2) Information concerning career options;
(3) Writing a resume;
(4) Information concerning opportunities for financial aid,
including the Free Application for Federal Student Aid and the
programs of the Western Interstate Commission for Higher
Education, and the manner in which to qualify for such
opportunities;
(5) Information concerning scholarship opportunities,
including, without limitation, the Governor Guinn Millennium
Scholarship Program and Silver State Opportunity Grant Program;
and
(6) Information concerning prepaid tuition and college
savings programs and plans established pursuant to chapter 353B of
NRS and section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. §
529.
2. [The standards of content and performance for the
instruction in financial literacy required by subsection 1 must be
included in the standards of content and performance established by
the Council to Establish Academic Standards for Public Schools
pursuant to NRS 389.520.] The instruction required by subsection 1
must be:
(a) Age-appropriate; and
(b) Included within a course of study for which the Council has
established the relevant standards of content and performance,
including, without limitation, a course of study in economics,
mathematics or social studies.
3. The board of trustees of each school district and the
governing body of each charter school in which pupils are enrolled
in any grade of grades 3 to 12, inclusive, shall encourage:
(a) Persons to volunteer time, expertise and resources to assist a
school district, governing body of a charter school, public school or
teacher in the provision of instruction in financial literacy; and
(b) Partnerships between a school district or charter school and
relevant persons, businesses or entities in which those persons,
businesses or entities provide the resources necessary to provide
instruction in financial literacy.
Sec. 35. NRS 389.850 is hereby amended to read as follows:
389.850 1. The State Board shall make the final selection of
all textbooks to be used in the public schools in this State, except for
charter schools. [If a textbook proposed for selection is in a subject
area for which standards of content have been established by the
Council to Establish Academic Standards for Public Schools
pursuant to NRS 389.520, the State Board shall not select the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 29 –
textbook unless the State Board determines that the textbook
adequately supports the standards for that subject area.]
2. A textbook must not be selected by the State Board pursuant
to subsection 1 for use in the public schools in classes in literature,
history or social sciences unless it accurately portrays the cultural
and racial diversity of our society, including lessons on the
contributions made to our society by men and women from various
racial and ethnic backgrounds.
3. Instructional materials, including, without limitation, a
textbook, must not be selected by the State Board pursuant to
subsection 1 for use in the public schools unless the State Board
determines that the instructional materials accurately portray the
history and contributions to science, the arts and humanities of the
groups of persons described in NRS 389.061.
Sec. 36. NRS 390.105 is hereby amended to read as follows:
390.105 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, the
State Board shall [, in consultation with the Council to Establish
Academic Standards for Public Schools,] prescribe examinations
that comply with 20 U.S.C. § 6311(b)(2) and that measure the
achievement and proficiency of pupils:
(a) For grades 3, 4, 5, 6, 7 and 8, in the standards of content
established by the Council for the subjects of English language arts
and mathematics.
(b) For grades 5 and 8, in the standards of content established by
the Council for the subject of science.
(c) For grades 9, 10, 11 and 12, in the standards of content
established by the Council for the subjects required to comply with
20 U.S.C. § 6311(b)(2).
 The examinations prescribed pursuant to this subsection must be
written, developed, printed and scored by a nationally recognized
testing company.
2. In addition to the examinations prescribed pursuant to
subsection 1, the State Board shall [, in consultation with the
Council to Establish Academic Standards for Public Schools,]
prescribe a writing examination for grades 5 and 8.
3. The Department shall ensure the availability of:
(a) The examinations prescribed pursuant to subsections 1 and 2
to pupils in any language in which those examinations are
published; and
(b) Authorized supports to pupils who are English learners for
the examinations prescribed pursuant to subsections 1 and 2.
4. The State Board shall prescribe:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 30 –
(a) The minimum number of school days that must take place
before the examinations prescribed by the State Board pursuant to
subsection 1 may be administered to pupils; and
(b) The period during which the examinations prescribed by the
State Board pursuant to subsection 1 must be administered.
5. The board of trustees of each school district and the
governing body of each charter school shall administer the
examinations prescribed by the State Board at such times as
prescribed by the State Board pursuant to subsection 4. The
examinations must be:
(a) Administered in each school in accordance with uniform
procedures adopted by the State Board. The Department shall
monitor the school districts and individual schools to ensure
compliance with the uniform procedures.
(b) Administered in each school in accordance with the plan
adopted pursuant to NRS 390.270 by the Department and with the
plan adopted pursuant to NRS 390.275 by the board of trustees of
the school district in which the examinations are administered. The
Department shall monitor the compliance of school districts and
individual schools with:
(1) The plan adopted by the Department; and
(2) The plan adopted by the board of trustees of the
applicable school district, to the extent that the plan adopted by the
board of trustees of the school district is consistent with the plan
adopted by the Department.
6. The Department may temporarily waive or otherwise pause
the requirement to administer examinations that comply with 20
U.S.C. § 6311(b)(2) pursuant to this section if the United States
Department of Education grants a waiver from or otherwise pauses
the requirements of 20 U.S.C. § 6311(b)(2).
Sec. 37. NRS 390.600 is hereby amended to read as follows:
390.600 1. The State Board shall adopt regulations that [,
except as otherwise provided in subsection 3,] prescribe the criteria
for a pupil to receive a standard high school diploma, which must
include, without limitation, the requirement that:
(a) A pupil enrolled in grade 11 take the college and career
readiness assessment administered pursuant to NRS 390.610; and
(b) Commencing with the graduating class of 2022 and each
graduating class thereafter, a pupil successfully complete a course of
study designed to prepare the pupil for graduation from high school
and for readiness for college and career.
2. The criteria prescribed by the State Board pursuant to
subsection 1 for a pupil to receive a standard high school diploma
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 31 –
must not include the results of the pupil on the college and career
readiness assessment administered to the pupil in grade 11 pursuant
to NRS 390.610.
3. [A pupil with a disability who does not satisfy the
requirements to receive a standard high school diploma prescribed
by the State Board pursuant to subsection 1 may receive a standard
high school diploma if the pupil demonstrates, through a portfolio of
the pupil’s work, proficiency in the standards of content and
performance established by the Council to Establish Academic
Standards for Public Schools pursuant to NRS 389.520.
4.] A pupil with a disability who does not satisfy the
requirements for receipt of a standard high school diploma
prescribed [in subsection 3 or] by the State Board pursuant to
subsection 1 may receive a diploma designated as an:
(a) Adjusted diploma if the pupil satisfies the requirements set
forth in his or her individualized education program; or
(b) Alternative diploma if the pupil:
(1) Has a significant cognitive disability; and
(2) Participates in an alternate assessment prescribed by the
State Board.
[5.] 4. If a pupil does not satisfy the requirements to receive a
standard high school diploma prescribed by [subsection 3 or by] the
State Board pursuant to subsection 1, the pupil must not be issued a
certificate of attendance or any other document indicating that the
pupil attended high school but did not satisfy the requirements for
such a diploma. The provisions of this subsection do not apply to a
pupil who receives an adjusted diploma or an alternative diploma
pursuant to subsection [4.] 3.
[6.] 5. As used in this section, “individualized education
program” has the meaning ascribed to it in 20 U.S.C. §
1414(d)(1)(A).
Sec. 38. NRS 390.830 is hereby amended to read as follows:
390.830 1. The State Board shall:
(a) In accordance with guidelines established by the National
Assessment Governing Board and National Center for Education
Statistics and in accordance with 20 U.S.C. §§ 6301 et seq. and the
regulations adopted pursuant thereto, adopt regulations requiring the
schools of this State that are selected by the National Assessment
Governing Board or the National Center for Education Statistics to
participate in the examinations of the National Assessment of
Educational Progress.
(b) Report the results of those examinations to the:
(1) Governor;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 32 –
(2) Board of trustees of each school district of this State;
(3) Joint Interim Standing Committee on Education created
pursuant to NRS 218E.320; and
(4) Legislative Bureau of Educational Accountability and
Program Evaluation created pursuant to NRS 218E.625.
(c) Include in the report required pursuant to paragraph (b) an
analysis and comparison of the results of pupils in this State on the
examinations required by this section with:
(1) The results of pupils throughout this country who
participated in the examinations of the National Assessment of
Educational Progress; and
(2) The results of pupils on the achievement and proficiency
examinations administered pursuant to this chapter.
2. If the report required by subsection 1 indicates that the
percentage of pupils enrolled in the public schools in this State who
are proficient on the National Assessment of Educational Progress
differs by more than 10 percent of the pupils who are proficient on
the examinations administered pursuant to NRS 390.105, the
Department shall prepare a written report describing the
discrepancy. The report must include, without limitation, a
comparison and evaluation of [:
(a) The standards of content and performance for English
language arts and mathematics established pursuant to NRS 389.520
with the standards for English language arts and mathematics that
are tested on the National Assessment.
(b) The] the standards for proficiency established for the
National Assessment with the standards for proficiency established
for the examinations that are administered pursuant to NRS 390.105.
3. The report prepared by the Department pursuant to
subsection 2 must be submitted to the:
(a) Governor;
(b) Joint Interim Standing Committee on Education; and
(c) Legislative Bureau of Educational Accountability and
Program Evaluation . [; and
(d) Council to Establish Academic Standards for Public Schools.
4. The Council to Establish Academic Standards for Public
Schools shall review and evaluate the report provided to the Council
pursuant to subsection 3 to identify any discrepancies in the
standards of content and performance established by the Council
that require revision and a timeline for carrying out the revision, if
necessary. The Council shall submit a written report of its review
and evaluation to the Joint Interim Standing Committee on
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 33 –
Education and Legislative Bureau of Educational Accountability
and Program Evaluation.]
Sec. 39. NRS 391.038 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391.038 1. The Commission, in consultation with educational
institutions in this State which offer courses of study and training
for the education of teachers, the board of trustees of each school
district in this State and other educational personnel, shall review
and evaluate a course of study and training offered by an
educational institution which is designed to provide the education
required for:
(a) The licensure of teachers or other educational personnel;
(b) The renewal of licenses of teachers or other educational
personnel; or
(c) An endorsement in a field of specialization.
 If the course of study and training meets the requirements
established by the Commission, it must be approved by the
Commission. [The Commission shall not approve a course of study
or training unless the course of study and training provides
instruction, to the extent deemed necessary by the Commission, in
the standards of content and performance prescribed by the Council
to Establish Academic Standards for Public Schools pursuant to
NRS 389.520.]
2. The Commission may review and evaluate such courses of
study and training itself or may recognize a course of study and
training approved by a national agency for accreditation acceptable
to the Commission.
3. The Commission shall adopt regulations establishing fees
for the review by the Commission of a course of study and training
submitted to the Commission by an educational institution.
4. The Commission, in consultation with educational
institutions in this State which offer courses of study and training
for the education of teachers and other educational personnel, shall
adopt regulations governing the approval by the Commission of
courses of study and training.
5. If the Commission denies or withdraws its approval of a
course of study or training, the educational institution is entitled to a
hearing and judicial review of the decision of the Commission.
Sec. 40. NRS 391A.125 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391A.125 1. Based upon the assessment of needs for training
within the region and priorities of training adopted by the governing
body pursuant to NRS 391A.175, each regional training program
shall provide:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 34 –
(a) Training for teachers and other licensed educational
personnel in the:
(1) [Standards established by the Council to Establish
Academic Standards for Public Schools pursuant to NRS 389.520;
(2)] Curriculum and instruction required for the standards
adopted by the State Board;
[(3)] (2) Curriculum and instruction recommended by the
Teachers and Leaders Council of Nevada; and
[(4)] (3) Culturally relevant pedagogy, taking into account
cultural diversity and demographic differences throughout this State.
(b) Through the Nevada Early Literacy Intervention Program
established for the regional training program, training for teachers
who teach kindergarten and grades 1, 2 or 3 on methods to teach
fundamental reading skills, including, without limitation:
(1) Phonemic awareness;
(2) Phonics;
(3) Vocabulary;
(4) Fluency;
(5) Comprehension; and
(6) Motivation.
(c) Training for administrators who conduct the evaluations
required pursuant to NRS 391.685, 391.690, 391.705 and 391.710
relating to the manner in which such evaluations are conducted.
Such training must be developed in consultation with the Teachers
and Leaders Council of Nevada created by NRS 391.455.
(d) Training for teachers, administrators and other licensed
educational personnel relating to correcting deficiencies and
addressing recommendations for improvement in performance that
are identified in the evaluations conducted pursuant to NRS
391.685, 391.690, 391.705 or 391.710.
(e) Training for teachers on methods to teach computer literacy
or computer science to pupils.
(f) At least one of the following types of training:
(1) Training for teachers and school administrators in the
assessment and measurement of pupil achievement and the effective
methods to analyze the test results and scores of pupils to improve
the achievement and proficiency of pupils.
(2) Training for teachers in specific content areas to enable
the teachers to provide a higher level of instruction in their
respective fields of teaching. Such training must include instruction
in effective methods to teach in a content area provided by teachers
who are considered masters in that content area.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 35 –
(3) In addition to the training provided pursuant to paragraph
(b), training for teachers in the methods to teach basic skills to
pupils, such as providing instruction in reading with the use of
phonics and providing instruction in basic skills of mathematics
computation.
(g) In accordance with the program established by the Statewide
Council pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 2 of NRS 391A.135
training for:
(1) Teachers on how to engage parents and families,
including, without limitation, disengaged families, in the education
of their children and to build the capacity of parents and families to
support the learning and academic achievement of their children.
(2) Training for teachers and paraprofessionals on working
with parent liaisons in public schools to carry out strategies and
practices for effective parental involvement and family engagement.
(h) Training and continuing professional development for
teachers who receive an endorsement to teach courses relating to
financial literacy pursuant to NRS 391.019 and 396.5198.
2. The training required pursuant to subsection 1 must:
(a) Include the activities set forth in 20 U.S.C. § 7801(42), as
deemed appropriate by the governing body for the type of training
offered.
(b) Include appropriate procedures to ensure follow-up training
for teachers and administrators who have received training through
the program.
(c) Incorporate training that addresses the educational needs of:
(1) Pupils with disabilities who participate in programs of
special education; and
(2) Pupils who are English learners.
3. The governing body of each regional training program shall
prepare and maintain a list that identifies programs for the
professional development of teachers and administrators that
successfully incorporate:
(a) [The standards of content and performance established by the
Council to Establish Academic Standards for Public Schools
pursuant to NRS 389.520;
(b)] Fundamental reading skills; and
[(c)] (b) Other training listed in subsection 1.
 The governing body shall provide a copy of the list on an annual
basis to school districts for dissemination to teachers and
administrators.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 36 –
4. A regional training program may include model classrooms
that demonstrate the use of educational technology for teaching and
learning.
5. A regional training program may contract with the board of
trustees of a school district that is served by the regional training
program as set forth in NRS 391A.120 to provide professional
development to the teachers and administrators employed by the
school district that is in addition to the training required by this
section. Any training provided pursuant to this subsection must
include the activities set forth in 20 U.S.C. § 7801(42), as deemed
appropriate by the governing body for the type of training offered.
6. To the extent money is available from legislative
appropriation or otherwise, a regional training program may provide
training to paraprofessionals.
7. To the extent that money is available, the Department shall
administer the training required pursuant to paragraph (h) of
subsection 1.
8. As used in this section, “paraprofessional” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 391.008.
Sec. 41. NRS 391A.190 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391A.190 1. The governing body of each regional training
program shall:
(a) Establish a method for the evaluation of the success of the
regional training program, including, without limitation, the Nevada
Early Literacy Intervention Program. The method must be consistent
with the uniform procedures and criteria adopted by the Statewide
Council pursuant to NRS 391A.135 and the standards for
professional development training adopted by the State Board
pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS 391A.370.
(b) On or before September 1 of each year and before submitting
the annual report pursuant to paragraph (c), submit the annual report
to the Statewide Council for its review and incorporate into the
annual report any revisions recommended by the Statewide Council.
(c) On or before December 1 of each year, submit an annual
report to the State Board, the board of trustees of each school district
served by the regional training program, the Commission on
Professional Standards in Education, the Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Education and the Legislative Bureau of Educational
Accountability and Program Evaluation that includes, without
limitation:
(1) The priorities for training adopted by the governing body
pursuant to NRS 391A.175.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 37 –
(2) The type of training offered through the regional training
program in the immediately preceding year.
(3) The number of teachers and administrators who received
training through the regional training program in the immediately
preceding year.
(4) The number of administrators who received training
pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection 1 of NRS 391A.125 in the
immediately preceding year.
(5) The number of teachers, administrators and other licensed
educational personnel who received training pursuant to paragraph
(d) of subsection 1 of NRS 391A.125 in the immediately preceding
year.
(6) The number of teachers who received training pursuant to
subparagraph (1) of paragraph (g) of subsection 1 of NRS 391A.125
in the immediately preceding year.
(7) The number of paraprofessionals, if any, who received
training through the regional training program in the immediately
preceding year.
(8) An evaluation of the effectiveness of the regional training
program, including, without limitation, the Nevada Early Literacy
Intervention Program, in accordance with the method established
pursuant to paragraph (a).
(9) An evaluation of whether the training included the:
(I) [Standards of content and performance established by
the Council to Establish Academic Standards for Public Schools
pursuant to NRS 389.520;
(II)] Curriculum and instruction required for the common
core standards adopted by the State Board;
[(III)] (II) Curriculum and instruction recommended by
the Teachers and Leaders Council of Nevada created by NRS
391.455; and
[(IV)] (III) Culturally relevant pedagogy, taking into
account cultural diversity and demographic differences throughout
this State.
(10) An evaluation of the effectiveness of training on
improving the quality of instruction and the achievement of pupils.
(11) A description of the gifts and grants, if any, received by
the governing body in the immediately preceding year and the gifts
and grants, if any, received by the Statewide Council during the
immediately preceding year on behalf of the regional training
program. The description must include the manner in which the gifts
and grants were expended.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 38 –
(12) The 5-year plan for the regional training program
prepared pursuant to NRS 391A.175 and any revisions to the plan
made by the governing body in the immediately preceding year.
2. The information included in the annual report pursuant to
paragraph (c) of subsection 1 must be aggregated for each regional
training program and disaggregated for each school district served
by the regional training program.
3. As used in this section, “paraprofessional” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 391.008.
Sec. 42. NRS 394.465 is hereby amended to read as follows:
394.465 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6,
before a postsecondary educational institution employs or contracts
with a person:
(a) To occupy an instructional position;
(b) To occupy an administrative or financial position, including
a position as school director, personnel officer, counselor, admission
representative, solicitor, canvasser, surveyor, financial aid officer or
any similar position; or
(c) To act as an agent for the institution,
 the applicant must submit to the Administrator the information
set forth in subsection 2.
2. The applicant must submit to the Administrator:
(a) A complete set of fingerprints taken by a law enforcement
agency and written permission authorizing the Administrator to
submit the applicant’s fingerprints to the Central Repository for
Nevada Records of Criminal History for submission to the Federal
Bureau of Investigation for a report on the applicant’s background
and to such other law enforcement agencies as the Administrator
deems necessary; or
(b) Written verification, on a form prescribed by the
Administrator, stating that the fingerprints of the applicant were
taken and directly forwarded electronically or by another means to
the Central Repository and that the applicant has given written
permission to the law enforcement agency or other authorized entity
taking the fingerprints to submit the fingerprints to the Central
Repository for submission to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for
a report on the applicant’s background and to such other law
enforcement agencies as the Administrator deems necessary.
3. The Administrator may:
(a) Unless the applicant’s fingerprints are directly forwarded
pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 2, submit those fingerprints
to the Central Repository for submission to the Federal Bureau of
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 39 –
Investigation and to such other law enforcement agencies as the
Administrator deems necessary; and
(b) Request from each such agency any information regarding
the applicant’s background as the Administrator deems necessary.
4. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 239.0115, the
Administrator shall keep the results of the investigation confidential.
5. The applicant shall pay the cost of the investigation.
6. An applicant is not required to satisfy the requirements of
this section if the applicant:
(a) Is licensed by the Superintendent of Public Instruction;
(b) Is an employee of the United States Department of Defense;
(c) Is a member of the faculty of an accredited postsecondary
educational institution in another state who is domiciled in a state
other than Nevada and is present in Nevada for a temporary period
to teach at a branch of that accredited institution;
(d) Is an instructor who provides instruction from a location
outside this State through a program of distance education for a
postsecondary educational institution licensed by the Commission
who previously underwent an investigation of his or her background
and the Administrator determines that an additional investigation is
not necessary; [or]
(e) Has satisfied the requirements of subsection 1 within the
immediately preceding 5 years [.] ; or
(f) Holds a professional or occupational license in this State
for which a background investigation was required.
7. As used in this section, “distance education” means
instruction delivered by means of video, computer, television, or the
Internet or other electronic means of communication, or any
combination thereof, in such a manner that the person supervising or
providing the instruction and the student receiving the instruction
are separated geographically.
Sec. 43. NRS 396.5195 is hereby amended to read as follows:
396.5195 The Board of Regents shall, in cooperation with the
State Board , [and the Council to Establish Academic Standards for
Public Schools,] ensure that students enrolled in a program
developed by the System for the education of teachers are provided
instruction regarding the standards of content and performance
required of pupils enrolled in high schools in this State.
Sec. 44. NRS 396.600 is hereby amended to read as follows:
396.600 The Public Service Division of the System consists of
the following public service departments:
1. [Agricultural] University of Nevada Cooperative Extension.
2. Agricultural Experiment Station.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 40 –
3. Bureau of Mines and Geology.
4. Such other departments as the Board of Regents may
designate.
Sec. 45. NRS 396.690 is hereby amended to read as follows:
396.690 1. The assent of the State of Nevada by its
Legislature is hereby given to the provisions and requirements of an
Act of Congress entitled “An Act to provide for cooperative
extension work between the agricultural colleges in the several
States receiving the benefits of an Act of Congress approved
July second, eighteen hundred and sixty-two, and of Acts
supplementary thereto, and the United States Department of
Agriculture,” approved May 8, 1914 (c. 79, 38 Stat. 372), and any
acts amendatory thereof and supplemental thereto. The Board of
Regents is hereby authorized and empowered to receive the grants
of money appropriated under such federal acts, and to organize and
conduct agricultural extension work which must be carried on in
connection with the College of Agriculture of the System, in
accordance with the terms and conditions expressed in such Acts of
Congress.
2. The Director of the [Agricultural] University of Nevada
Cooperative Extension [Department] of the Public Service Division
of the System shall conduct all business of the [Agricultural]
University of Nevada Cooperative Extension [Department] and
administer all funds of the [Agricultural] University of Nevada
Cooperative Extension , [Department,] including, without
limitation, in each county that has entered into an agreement with or
participates in a program of the [Agricultural] University of Nevada
Cooperative Extension . [Department.]
Sec. 46. NRS 422.165 is hereby amended to read as follows:
422.165 1. The [Advisory Committee on Medicaid
Innovation created by NRS 422.162] Division shall study:
(a) The manner in which to create or expand public or private
prescription purchasing coalitions.
(b) The manner in which to encourage access to employer-based
health insurance plans, including, without limitation:
(1) Coordinating coverage provided by the State Plan for
Medicaid and private health insurance which may be provided by an
employer to a person eligible for Medicaid; and
(2) Providing assistance to a person who is eligible for
Medicaid to allow the person to purchase private health insurance.
(c) Opportunities to apply to the Secretary of the United States
Department of Health and Human Services for certain waivers
pursuant to 42 U.S.C. §§ 1315 and 18052.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 41 –
2. At least once each year, the [Advisory Committee] Division
shall make such recommendations to the Director as it deems
appropriate relating to opportunities to improve Medicaid or to
increase access to health insurance.
Sec. 47. NRS 459.670 is hereby amended to read as follows:
459.670 As used in NRS 459.670 to [459.686,] 459.684,
inclusive, the words and terms defined in NRS 459.672 to 459.678,
inclusive, have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 48. NRS 480.140 is hereby amended to read as follows:
480.140 The primary functions and responsibilities of the
divisions of the Department are as follows:
1. The Investigation Division shall:
(a) Execute, administer and enforce the provisions of chapter
453 of NRS relating to controlled substances and chapter 454 of
NRS relating to dangerous drugs;
(b) Investigate technological crime, as defined in NRS
[205A.030,] 179.1217, and enforce the provisions of the law of this
State relating to technological crime, as defined in NRS [205A.030;]
179.1217;
(c) Provide investigative services to the divisions of the
Department as determined by the Director;
(d) Assist the Secretary of State in carrying out an investigation
pursuant to NRS 293.124;
(e) Upon request, assist:
(1) The Department of Taxation in carrying out a criminal
investigation relating to cannabis pursuant to NRS 372A.200 to
372A.380, inclusive, and chapter 678A of NRS;
(2) The Division of Public and Behavioral Health of the
Department of Health and Human Services in carrying out a
criminal investigation relating to cannabis pursuant to chapter 678C
of NRS; and
(3) The Cannabis Compliance Board in carrying out a
criminal investigation pursuant to title 56 of NRS; and
(f) Perform such duties and exercise such powers as may be
conferred upon it pursuant to this chapter and any other specific
statute.
2. The Nevada Highway Patrol Division shall, in conjunction
with the Department of Motor Vehicles, execute, administer and
enforce the provisions of chapters 484A to 484E, inclusive, of NRS
and perform such duties and exercise such powers as may be
conferred upon it pursuant to NRS 480.360 and any other specific
statute.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 42 –
3. The State Fire Marshal Division shall execute, administer
and enforce the provisions of chapter 477 of NRS and perform such
duties and exercise such powers as may be conferred upon it
pursuant to chapter 477 of NRS and any other specific statute.
4. The Division of Parole and Probation shall execute,
administer and enforce the provisions of chapters 176A and 213 of
NRS relating to parole and probation and perform such duties and
exercise such powers as may be conferred upon it pursuant to those
chapters and any other specific statute.
5. The Capitol Police Division shall assist in the enforcement
of subsection 1 of NRS 331.140.
6. The Nevada Office of Cyber Defense Coordination shall:
(a) Serve as the strategic planning, facilitating and coordinating
office for cybersecurity policy and planning in this State; and
(b) Execute, administer and enforce the provisions of NRS
480.900 to 480.950, inclusive, and perform such duties and exercise
such powers as may be conferred upon it pursuant to NRS 480.900
to 480.950, inclusive, and any other specific statute.
7. The Training Division shall provide training to the
employees of the Department.
8. The Records, Communications and Compliance Division
shall:
(a) Execute, administer and enforce the provisions of chapter
179A of NRS and perform such duties and exercise such powers as
may be conferred upon it pursuant to chapter 179A of NRS and any
other specific statute;
(b) Provide dispatch services for the Department and other
agencies as determined by the Director;
(c) Maintain records of the Department as determined by the
Director; and
(d) Provide support services to the Director, the divisions of the
Department and the Nevada Criminal Justice Information System as
may be imposed by the Director.
Sec. 49. NRS 480.460 is hereby amended to read as follows:
480.460 The Chief of the Investigation Division shall:
1. Furnish services relating to the investigation of crimes,
including interrogation with the use of polygraph instruments, upon
the request of the following:
(a) The Attorney General;
(b) The head of any agency, bureau, board, commission,
department, division, office or other unit of the Executive
Department of the State Government which is authorized or required
to conduct criminal investigations; or
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 43 –
(c) Any sheriff, chief of police or district attorney.
2. Disseminate information relating to the dangers of the use of
controlled substances and dangerous drugs.
3. Provide and operate a system of recording all information
received by the Investigation Division relating to persons who have
alleged connections with organized crime or have some connection
with violations of laws regulating controlled substances or
dangerous drugs.
4. Arrange for the purchase of controlled substances and
dangerous drugs when such a purchase is necessary in an
investigation of offenses relating to controlled substances and
dangerous drugs.
5. Procure from law enforcement agencies and other reliable
sources information relating to violators of laws which govern
controlled substances and dangerous drugs, including information
about their character, probable motives, circumstances of arrest,
methods of operation and other pertinent information.
6. Enforce the provisions of chapter 453 of NRS.
7. Furnish information relating to any person of whom he or
she maintains a record to any law enforcement agency.
8. Assist the Secretary of State in carrying out an investigation
pursuant to NRS 293.124.
9. Upon request, assist:
(a) The Department of Taxation in carrying out a criminal
investigation relating to cannabis pursuant to NRS 372A.200 to
372A.380, inclusive, and chapter 678A of NRS;
(b) The Division of Public and Behavioral Health of the
Department of Health and Human Services in carrying out a
criminal investigation relating to cannabis pursuant to chapter 678C
of NRS; and
(c) The Cannabis Compliance Board in carrying out a criminal
investigation pursuant to title 56 of NRS.
10. Investigate technological crime, as defined in NRS
[205A.030,] 179.1217, and enforce the provisions of the law of this
State relating to technological crime, as defined in NRS [205A.030.]
179.1217.
Sec. 50. NRS 563.290 is hereby amended to read as follows:
563.290 1. The Rangeland Resources Commission is hereby
created. The Commission consists of:
(a) One member from each state grazing board; and
(b) The president of:
(1) The Nevada Cattlemen’s Association or its successor
organization;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 44 –
(2) The Nevada Woolgrowers’ Association or its successor
organization; and
(3) The Nevada Farm Bureau or its successor organization.
 Each member specified in this paragraph serves as an ex officio
member of the Commission and may designate another person to
serve on the member’s behalf.
2. Not less than 30 days before the expiration of the term of a
member of the Commission, the state grazing board from which the
member was appointed shall submit to the Governor a written list of
two persons for appointment to the Commission. A person
nominated by a state grazing board must be a member of that board.
If such a list is submitted to the Governor by a state grazing board
within the period prescribed in this subsection, the Governor shall
appoint to the Commission one member from the list. If the list is
not submitted to the Governor by a state grazing board within that
period, the Governor shall appoint to the Commission one member
who is a member of that board.
3. The members of the Commission shall elect a Chair and
Vice Chair by a majority vote. After the initial election, the Chair
and Vice Chair serve in the office for a term of 1 year beginning on
July 1 of each year. If a vacancy occurs in the office of the Chair or
Vice Chair, the members of the Commission shall elect a Chair or
Vice Chair from among its members to serve for the remainder of
the unexpired term.
4. After the initial terms, each member of the Commission who
is appointed serves for a term of 4 years. To the extent practicable,
the terms of the appointed members must be staggered.
5. A vacancy on the Commission must be filled in the same
manner as the original appointment.
6. Each member of the Commission:
(a) Serves without compensation; and
(b) While engaged in the business of the Commission, and to the
extent that money is available for that purpose from the fees
collected pursuant to NRS 563.340, is entitled to receive the per
diem allowance and travel expenses provided for state officers and
employees generally.
7. The per diem allowance and travel expenses of a member of
the Commission must be paid from the fees collected pursuant to
NRS 563.340.
Sec. 51. NRS 178A.300, 178A.310, 178A.320, 178A.330,
205A.010, 205A.020, 205A.030, 205A.040, 205A.050, 205A.060,
205A.070, 205A.080, 205A.090, 205A.100, 281.157, 281.1571,
281.1572, 281.1573, 281.1574, 281.1575, 389.500, 389.505,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 45 –
389.510, 389.520, 389.525, 389.530, 389.540, 390.115, 422.162,
459.686, 487.002, 705.800, 705.810, 705.820, 705.830, 705.840,
705.850, 705.860, 705.870, 705.880, 705.890 and 705.900 are
hereby repealed.
Sec. 52. 1. Any administrative regulations adopted by an
officer or an agency whose name has been changed or whose
responsibilities have been transferred pursuant to the provisions of
this act to another officer or agency remain in force until amended
by the officer or agency to which the responsibility for the adoption
of the regulations has been transferred.
2. Any contracts or other agreements entered into by an officer
or agency whose name has been changed or whose responsibilities
have been transferred pursuant to the provisions of this act to
another officer or agency are binding upon the officer or agency to
which the responsibility for the administration of the provisions of
the contract or other agreement has been transferred. Such contracts
and other agreements may be enforced by the officer or agency to
which the responsibility for the enforcement of the provisions of the
contract or other agreement has been transferred.
3. Any action taken by an officer or agency whose name has
been changed or whose responsibilities have been transferred
pursuant to the provisions of this act to another officer or agency
remains in effect as if taken by the officer or agency to which the
responsibility for the enforcement of such actions has been
transferred.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)